California, session 20252026, AB240.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 74000 of the Education Code is amended to read:74000. The Legislature hereby declares as its policy that all of the territory of the state shall be included within a community college district or otherwise provided with equivalent opportunities for residents to participate in both in-person and online postsecondary education community college programs and courses.SEC. 2. Section 74000.5 is added to the Education Code, to read:74000.5. (a) The Milton Marks “Little Hoover” Commission on California State Government Organization and Economy California Research Bureau shall conduct a study and prepare a report evaluating the provision of postsecondary education community college services and opportunities to residents of the underserved Counties of Amador, Alpine, Mariposa, Modoc, and Sierra that are not fully included within the territory of a community college district. The report shall include policy recommendations regarding how the state can ensure that residents of these five counties have opportunities to participate in both in-person and online postsecondary education community college programs and courses equivalent to those of similarly sized communities that are fully included within the territory of a community college district.(b) The report and recommendations required by subdivision (a) shall include consideration of include, but are not limited to, all of the following:(1) An analysis of the educational and economic impacts of the existing deficit of community college services and opportunities in the five underserved counties identified in subdivision (a), and the potential benefits of providing equivalent opportunities to these communities. (a).(2) (A) An analysis of the potential benefits of providing equivalent community college services and opportunities in the five underserved counties identified in subdivision (a). (B) For purposes of subparagraph (A), “equivalent community colleges services and opportunities” means community college services and opportunities offered in communities of a similar size to the five underserved counties identified in subdivision (a) that are fully included within the territory of a community college district.(2)(3) An analysis of the current availability of, and opportunities to strengthen, dual enrollment opportunities with community colleges and transfer pathways. pathways to public postsecondary educational institutions.(3)Identification of outreach and recruitment services in the five underserved counties identified in subdivision (a) by public and private postsecondary educational institutions, and collaborations that are operating or in process to expand access to postsecondary education programs and services in other parts of the state. (4) Identification of existing community colleges, four-year public postsecondary educational institutions, and independent institutions of higher education that are conducting outreach, recruitment, and providing in-person or online postsecondary education programs and services within the five underserved counties identified in subdivision (a).(4)(5) Identification of potential providers of both in-person and online postsecondary education programs and services within the five underserved counties identified in subdivision (a), and options for implementing those programs and services.(5)(6) Identification of opportunities and resources needed to provide in-person postsecondary education community college programs and courses in locations reasonably accessible to a majority of residents of the five underserved counties identified in subdivision (a).(6)(7) Identification of opportunities for partnership with local educational agencies, public and private postsecondary educational institutions, local governments, and nonprofit organizations to facilitate expanded community college opportunities to serve the residents of the five underserved counties identified in subdivision (a).(7)(8) An analysis of resource needs and potential funding sources for expanding postsecondary education community college services and opportunities to the residents of the five underserved counties identified in subdivision (a).(8)(9) Identification of potential legislative and administrative actions that may be taken to ensure that residents of the five underserved counties identified in subdivision (a) have opportunities to participate in both in-person and online postsecondary education community college programs and courses equivalent to those of similarly sized communities that are fully included within the territory of a community college district.(c) For purposes of this section, the commission bureau may request and receive, but not require, information from the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges and the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, the State Department of Education, any community college district, any local educational agency, the office of the Chancellor of the California State University, the office of the President of the University of California, or any organization representing independent institutions of higher education in the state. education.(d) (1) To assist with and inform the development of the report and recommendations required by this section, the commission bureau shall convene and consult a working group that includes voluntary representatives from all of the following:(1)(A) One representative from each of the five underserved counties identified in subdivision (a).(2)(B) One representative of an organization representing rural counties.(3)(C) Representatives from one or more of the community college districts adjacent to each of the five underserved counties identified in subdivision (a).(4)(D) One representative of the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.(5)(E) One representative of the office of the Chancellor of the California State University.(6)(F) One representative of the office of the President of the University of California.(7)(G) One representative of an organization of independent, nonprofit colleges and universities in California.(8)(H) One representative of the State Department of Education.(9)(I) Representatives from one or more local educational agencies located within each of the five underserved counties identified in subdivision (a).(2) The working group established pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be subject to the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).(e) (1) On or before December 31, 2026, the commission 2027, the bureau shall submit the report and recommendations required by this section to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature Assembly Committee on Higher Education, the Senate Committee on Education, and the Governor.(2) The report and recommendations to be submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(f) For purposes of this section the following definitions apply:(1)“Commission” means the Milton Marks “Little Hoover” Commission on California State Government Organization and Economy.(1) “Bureau” means the California Research Bureau.(2) “Independent institutions of higher education” has the same meaning as specified in Section 66010.(2)(3) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.(g) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section is repealed on January 1, 2031.SEC. 3. The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because the Counties of Amador, Alpine, Mariposa, Modoc, and Sierra are not within a community college district.